Alabama, session 2026rs, HB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
62 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
63 the Youth Athlete Protection Act.
64 Section 2. For the purposes of this act, the following
65 terms have the following meanings:
66 (1) CHILD ABUSE. Physical abuse, sexual abuse or
67 exploitation, negligent treatment, or mental or emotional
68 abuse of an individual under 18 years of age.
69 (2) COACH. An individual employed or volunteering as a
70 coach, manager, or supervisor of a youth athletic activity.
71 The term does not include:
72 a. Any individual who occasionally assists with or
73 supports a youth athletic activity; or
74 b. Any employee or volunteer of a youth sports
75 organization that provides passing, general, or nominal
76 assistance with or support of a youth athletic activity.
77 (3) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Human
78 Resources.
79 (4) LOCAL GOVERNMENT. A city, county, or other local
80 government that provides youth athletes the opportunity to
81 participate in scheduled competitive or recreational sporting
82 activities, whether individually or as a team.
83 (5) YOUTH ATHLETE. An individual under 18 years of age
84 participating in a youth sports organization.
Page 3

participating in a youth sports organization.
HB103 INTRODUCED
85 (6) YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION. Any organization that,
86 as part of its core function, provides youth athletes the
87 opportunity to participate in scheduled competitive or
88 recreational sporting activities, whether individually or as a
89 team. The term does not include any of the following:
90 a. An organization that only offers sporting activities
91 incidental to a nonathletic program or lesson.
92 b. A public or private preK-12 school.
93 c. A licensed child-care facility, as defined in
94 Section 38-7-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
95 d. A public or private institution of higher education.
96 e. An organization that offers recreational sporting
97 activities only by providing the opportunity to participate in
98 unsupervised, unscheduled competitive or recreational sporting
99 events on a walk-in basis.
100 Section 3. (a) No later than January 1, 2027, the
101 department shall adopt and publish a model Youth Athlete
102 Protection Policy. The department shall consider national
103 standards relating to the prevention of child abuse, such as
104 those developed by the U.S. Center for SafeSport, when
105 developing the model policy. The model policy shall include,
106 but not be limited to, each of the following:
107 (1) Standards for prohibited conduct in youth sports.
108 The policy shall include a list of prohibited conduct by
109 parents, spectators, coaches, and youth athletes to prevent
110 the abuse of youth athletes. Prohibited conduct shall include,
111 but not be limited to, sexual abuse or misconduct, physical
112 abuse or misconduct, emotional abuse or misconduct, bullying,
Page 4

abuse or misconduct, emotional abuse or misconduct, bullying,
HB103 INTRODUCED
113 harassment, hazing, grooming behaviors, and any other
114 behaviors that risk the safety of youth athletes.
115 (2) A code of conduct for parents, spectators, coaches,
116 and youth athletes to follow. The code of conduct shall
117 include appropriate one-on-one interactions between players
118 and coaches and shall address topics including, but not
119 limited to, appropriate use of electronic communications
120 between adults and youth athletes, travel supervision
121 policies, and appropriate use of locker rooms and restrooms.
122 (3) A mandatory reporting policy for adults who have
123 knowledge of an act of prohibited conduct.
124 (b)(1) The department shall require each youth sports
125 organization and local government to annually certify
126 compliance with this act. The annual certification shall
127 include: (i) confirmation that the youth sports organization
128 or local government has a Youth Athlete Protection Policy that
129 complies with this act; and (ii) verification that each coach
130 has satisfactorily completed a criminal history background
131 check, completed mandatory reporter training, and been
132 provided a copy of the relevant Youth Athlete Protection
133 Policy. The department shall publish a list of all certified
134 youth sports organizations and local governments on the
135 department's website.
136 (2) A youth sports organization or local government
137 that is found to be out of compliance with the requirements of
138 this act shall immediately suspend the provision of youth
139 athletic activities until the entity provides documentation to
140 the department which verifies the entity has come into
Page 5

the department which verifies the entity has come into
HB103 INTRODUCED
141 compliance.
142 (c) The department shall develop a mandatory reporter
143 training program for coaches. The mandatory reporter training
144 shall include, but not be limited to, explanations of: (i) who
145 is a mandatory reporter and circumstances that must be
146 reported; (ii) the responsibilities of coaches as it relates
147 to the reporting of suspected child abuse; (iii) how to
148 respond to disclosures of child abuse or reports of behavior
149 that violate the prohibited conduct policy in a supportive and
150 appropriate manner that meets the mandatory reporting
151 requirements pursuant to state law; and (iv) child abuse
152 prevention strategies. In developing the mandatory reporter
153 training program, the department may use resources from
154 relevant national groups, such as the U.S. Center for
155 SafeSport.
156 (d) The department shall adopt rules to implement and
157 administer this act.
158 Section 4. (a)(1) No later than January 1, 2027, each
159 youth sports organization shall adopt a Youth Athlete
160 Protection Policy including, but not limited to: (i) standards
161 for prohibited conduct in youth sports; (ii) a code of conduct
162 for parents, spectators, coaches, and youth athletes; and
163 (iii) a mandatory reporting policy. The policy, at a minimum,
164 shall reflect the model policy developed by the department in
165 Section 3. Each youth sports organization shall provide a copy
166 of the Youth Athlete Protection Policy to all coaches employed
167 by or volunteering for the organization and parents of youth
168 athletes participating in a sport offered by that
Page 6

athletes participating in a sport offered by that
HB103 INTRODUCED
169 organization.
170 (2) Each youth sports organization shall require each
171 of its coaches to: (i) comply with the organization's
172 prohibited conduct policy; and (ii) annually complete
173 mandatory reporter training, as provided in Section 3.
174 (b)(1)a. Each youth sports organization shall require
175 each coach to obtain, prior to his or her employment or
176 acceptance as a volunteer, a criminal history background check
177 from the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency (ALEA). ALEA may
178 provide the results of the criminal history background check
179 to the youth sports organization where the coach is seeking to
180 be employed or volunteer. The youth sports organization may
181 use the criminal history background check only for purposes of
182 making hiring or volunteer decisions, and the results of the
183 criminal history background check are otherwise confidential.
184 b. Youth sports organizations may rely on the results
185 of a criminal history background check when making hiring and
186 volunteer decisions. Youth sports organizations are immune
187 from any civil liability relating to the hiring of a coach or
188 acceptance of a coach as a volunteer, except where the youth
189 sports organization: (i) knows the information relating to the
190 coach's criminal history background check is false; or (ii)
191 acts with reckless disregard concerning the veracity of that
192 information.
193 (2) No youth sports organization may hire or accept as
194 a volunteer a coach if a criminal history background check
195 performed on that individual shows that he or she has been
196 convicted of, pled nolo contendere to, or has received a
Page 7

convicted of, pled nolo contendere to, or has received a
HB103 INTRODUCED
197 deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for:
198 a. Any felony under Chapter 15 of Title 26, Code of
199 Alabama 1975;
200 b. Any sex offense under Section 15-20A-5, Code of
201 Alabama 1975;
202 c. Any felony assault or sexual offense under Title
203 13A, Code of Alabama 1975, in which the victim is an
204 individual under 18 years of age or older, or any other
205 offense involving child abuse; or
206 d. Any comparable offense provided in this subsection
207 which was committed in any other state.
208 Section 5. (a)(1) No later than January 1, 2027, each
209 local government shall adopt a Youth Athlete Protection Policy
210 including, but not limited to: (i) standards for prohibited
211 conduct in youth sports; (ii) a code of conduct for parents,
212 spectators, coaches, and youth athletes; and (iii) a mandatory
213 reporting policy. The policy, at a minimum, shall reflect the
214 model policy developed by the department in Section 3. Each
215 local government shall provide a copy of the Youth Athlete
216 Protection Policy to all coaches employed by or volunteering
217 for the local government and parents of youth athletes
218 participating in a sport offered by that local government.
219 (2) Each local government shall require each of its
220 coaches to: (i) comply with the local government's prohibited
221 conduct policy; and (ii) annually complete mandatory reporter
222 training, as provided in Section 3.
223 (b)(1)a. Each local government shall require each coach
224 to obtain, prior to his or her employment or acceptance as a
Page 8

to obtain, prior to his or her employment or acceptance as a
HB103 INTRODUCED
225 volunteer, a criminal history background check from the
226 Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency (ALEA). ALEA may provide
227 the results of the criminal history background check to the
228 local government where the coach is seeking to be employed or
229 volunteer. The local government may use the criminal history
230 background check only for purposes of making hiring or
231 volunteer decisions, and the results of the criminal history
232 background check are otherwise confidential.
233 b. Local governments may rely on the results of a
234 criminal history background check when making hiring and
235 volunteer decisions. Local governments are immune from any
236 civil liability relating to the hiring of a coach or
237 acceptance of a coach as a volunteer, except where the local
238 government: (i) knows the information relating to the coach's
239 criminal history background check is false; or (ii) acts with
240 reckless disregard concerning the veracity of that
241 information.
242 (2) No local government may hire or accept as a
243 volunteer a coach if a criminal history background check
244 performed on that individual shows that he or she has been
245 convicted of, pled nolo contendere to, or has received a
246 deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for:
247 a. Any felony under Chapter 15 of Title 26, Code of
248 Alabama 1975;
249 b. Any sex offense under Section 15-20A-5, Code of
250 Alabama 1975;
251 c. Any felony assault or sexual offense under Title
252 13A, Code of Alabama 1975, in which the victim is an
Page 9

13A, Code of Alabama 1975, in which the victim is an
HB103 INTRODUCED
253 individual under 18 years of age or older, or any other
254 offense involving child abuse; or
255 d. Any comparable offense provided in this subsection
256 which was committed in any other state.
257 Section 6. This act shall become effective on October
258 1, 2026.
Page 10